Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 28 MARKETING ACT OF 1939
35-28-113.5. Refunds of assessments - request by producer.

Marketing orders issued after July 1, 1987, as well as amendments to such marketing orders and amendments to marketing orders in existence prior to July 1, 1987, which marketing orders and amendments are issued pursuant to the provisions of this article and which directly affect producers, may contain provisions for refunds of assessments or for refunds of portions of assessments. Any marketing order or amendment which contains such a provision shall not become effective unless and until the commissioner determines that the issuance of such order is approved and favored by at least a simple majority of the producers who participated in a referendum on the question of its approval and who, during such representative period, have produced for market the commodities specified therein in commercial quantities within the production area specified in such marketing agreement or order. Only the assessment or assessment raise or raises approved by a simple majority of the producers as provided in this subsection (1) or that portion of the assessment or assessment raise which is actually levied by the commissioner shall be subject to the provisions of this section.

A producer may request a refund of assessments or a refund of a portion of assessments within thirty days after payment of such assessments. The commissioner shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary for the implementation of this section.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1288, § 1, effective April 6.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1222, § 3, effective April 13.

35-28-114. Disposition of funds.

Any moneys collected by the commissioner pursuant to this article shall be deposited in a bank or other depository approved by the state treasurer, allocated to each marketing order under which they are collected, and disbursed by the commissioner only for the necessary expenses incurred by the board of control and the commissioner and approved by the commissioner with respect to each such separate marketing order. Funds so collected shall be deposited and disbursed in conformity with appropriate rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner. All such expenditures by the commissioner shall be audited at least annually and a copy of such audit shall be delivered within thirty days after the completion thereof to the governor and the commissioner of agriculture.

Any moneys remaining in such fund, allocable to any particular agricultural commodity affected by a marketing order, at the discretion of the commissioner, may be refunded at the close of any marketing season, upon a pro rata basis, to all persons from whom assessments were collected, or such portion of such moneys as may be recommended by the board of control and approved by the commissioner may be carried over into the next succeeding marketing season whenever the commissioner finds that such moneys may be required to assist in defraying the cost of operating such marketing order in such succeeding season. Upon termination by the commissioner of any marketing order, any moneys remaining, and not required by the commissioner to defray the expenses of such marketing order, shall be returned by the commissioner, upon a pro rata basis, to all persons from whom assessments were collected. If the commissioner finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of such pro rata refund to such persons, the commissioner may use the moneys in such fund to defray the expenses incurred by him in the formulation, issuance, administration, or enforcement of any subsequent marketing order for such commodity.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 203, § 9.

CSA:

C. 106, § 54.

L. 51:

p. 560, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 7-3-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-3-14.

35-28-115. Limitation of marketing orders.

Marketing orders issued by the commissioner under this article may be limited in their application by prescribing the marketing areas or portions of the state in which a particular order shall be effective. No marketing order shall be issued by the commissioner unless it embraces all persons of a like class in a given area who are engaged in a specific and distinctive agricultural industry or trade within this state.

Within the terms of this article, production or marketing areas as to peaches shall be classified as early maturing, which shall be at altitudes of less than five thousand feet, and late maturing, which shall be at altitudes of more than five thousand feet, and such areas shall be separate and distinct classes for all purposes under this article insofar as peaches are concerned.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 205, § 10.

CSA:

C. 106, § 55.

CRS 53:

§ 7-3-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-3-15.

35-28-116. Administration and enforcement.

The commissioner of agriculture shall be responsible for the administration and enforcement of this article.

Every person who violates any provision of this article 28 or any provision of any marketing order duly issued by the commissioner under this article 28 commits a petty offense. Each day during which any such violations continue constitutes a separate offense.

Upon the filing of a verified complaint charging violation of any provisions of this article or of any provision of any marketing order issued by the commissioner under this article, and prior to the institution of any court proceeding authorized in this section, the commissioner in his discretion may refer the matter to the attorney general or any district attorney of this state for action pursuant to the provisions of this article or call a hearing to consider the charges set forth in such verified complaint. In such case, the commissioner shall cause a copy of such complaint, together with a notice of the time and place of hearing of such complaint, to be served personally, or by mail, upon the person named as respondent therein. Such service shall be made at least three days before said hearing date. The hearing shall be held in the city or town in which is situated the principal place of business of the respondent, or in which the violation complained of is alleged to have occurred, or in the nearest office of the department of agriculture, at the discretion of the commissioner. At the time and place designated for such hearing, the commissioner or his agents shall hear the parties to said complaint and shall enter in the office of the commissioner at Denver his findings based upon facts established at such hearing.

If the commissioner finds that no violation has occurred he shall forthwith dismiss such complaint and notify the parties to such complaint.

If the commissioner finds that a violation has occurred he shall so enter his findings and notify the parties to such complaint. Should the respondent thereafter fail, neglect, or refuse to desist from such violation, within the time specified by the commissioner, the commissioner may thereupon file a complaint against such respondent in a court of competent jurisdiction as set forth in this section.

Each district attorney of this state may upon his own initiative and shall upon any complaint of any person, if, after investigation he believes a violation has occurred, bring a criminal action in the proper court in his district in the name of the people of this state in any court of competent jurisdiction in the state of Colorado against any person violating any provision of this article or of any marketing order duly issued by the commissioner under this article.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or of any marketing order or rule adopted pursuant to this article is subject to a civil penalty as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction or by the commissioner. The penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per violation; except that such penalty may be doubled if it is determined, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, that the person has violated the provision, marketing order, or rule on at least one prior occasion occurring after March 23, 1995.

No civil penalty may be imposed by the commissioner unless the person charged is given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect the civil penalty, or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may bring suit to recover such amount plus costs and attorney fees by action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Before imposing any civil penalty, the court or the commissioner may consider the effect of such penalty on the person charged.

All penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the general fund.

The commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this article.

Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe a violation of any provision of this article or any marketing order or rule issued pursuant to this article has occurred and immediate enforcement is deemed necessary, the commissioner may issue an order requiring any person to cease and desist from such violation. Such cease-and-desist order shall set forth the provisions alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to have constituted the violation, and the requirement that all actions cease immediately. At any time after service of the order to cease and desist, the person may request a prompt hearing to determine whether or not such violation has occurred. Such hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and shall be determined promptly.

Whenever the commissioner possesses evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this article or of any marketing order or rule issued under this article, the commissioner may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article or any marketing order, rule, or order under this article. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

The judgment, if in favor of the plaintiff, shall provide that the defendant pay to the plaintiff reasonable costs of such suit including attorney's fees incurred by an advisory board in the prosecution of such action.

Any such action may be commenced either in the county where defendant resides or where any act or omission or part thereof complained thereof occurred.

The penalties and remedies prescribed in this article with respect to any violation mentioned in this article shall be concurrent and alternative, and neither singly nor combined shall the same be exclusive and either singly or combined the same shall be cumulative with any other civil, criminal, or administrative rights, remedies, forfeitures, or penalties provided or allowed by law with respect to any such violation.

Any handler or processor located outside of this state who processes products which are marketed or distributed in this state on a continuing basis, whether directly or indirectly, shall be considered to be engaged in the transaction of business within this state and shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state pursuant to the provisions of section 13-1-124, C.R.S. Any action to enforce any provision of this article or any marketing order issued pursuant to this article against such out-of-state handler or processor by the commissioner shall be considered to have arisen from the transaction of business in this state and shall subject the handler or processor to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 205, § 11.

CSA:

C. 106, § 56.

CRS 53:

§ 7-3-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-3-16.

L. 73:

p. 200, § 1.

L. 95:

(7) and (8) amended, p. 65, § 1, effective March 23.

L. 2004:

(7)(a), (8)(b), and (8)(c) amended, p. 65, § 1, effective March 8.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3279, § 627, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

Section 2 of chapter 19, Session Laws of Colorado 2004, provides that the act amending subsections (7)(a), (8)(b), and (8)(c) applies to marketing orders issued before, on, or after March 8, 2004.

35-28-117. Assessment a personal debt.

Any assessment levied in such specified amount as may be determined by the commissioner pursuant to the provisions of section 35-28-113 shall constitute a personal debt of every person so assessed and shall be due and payable to the commissioner when payment is called for by the commissioner. In the event of failure of such person to pay any such assessment upon the date determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may file a complaint against such person in a state court of competent jurisdiction for the collection thereof, as provided in section 35-28-116.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 207, § 12.

CSA:

C. 106, § 57.

CRS 53:

§ 7-3-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-3-17.

35-28-118. No personal liability.

The members of any such board of control, including employees of such board, shall not be held responsible individually in any way whatsoever to any producer, processor, distributor, or other handler or any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person, or employee, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No such person or employee shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of such board. The liability of the members of such board shall be several and not joint and no member shall be liable for the default of any other member.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 207, § 13.

CSA:

C. 106, § 58.

CRS 53:

§ 7-3-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-3-18.

35-28-119. Records - information - hearings.

The commissioner may require all processors or distributors subject to the provisions of any marketing order issued pursuant to this article to maintain books and records reflecting their operations under said marketing order, and to furnish to the commissioner or his duly authorized or designated representatives such information as may be from time to time requested by them relating to operations under said marketing order, and to permit the inspection by said commissioner, or his duly authorized or designated representatives, of such portions of such books and records as relate to operations under said marketing order.

Information obtained by any person under this article shall be confidential and shall not be by him disclosed to any other person save to a person with like right to obtain the same, or any attorney employed to give legal advice thereupon, or by court order.

To carry out the purposes of this article, the commissioner may hold hearings, take testimony, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, and issue subpoenas for the production of books, records, or documents of any kind. Upon failure or refusal of any witness to obey any subpoena, the commissioner may petition the district court, and upon proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey the order of court shall be punishable as a contempt of court.

No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing documentary evidence before the commissioner in obedience to the subpoena of the commissioner on the ground or for the reason that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to a penalty or forfeiture; but no natural person shall be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he may be so required to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, before the commissioner in obedience to a subpoena issued by him; except that no natural person so testifying shall be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury in the first degree committed in so testifying.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 207, § 14.

CSA:

C. 106, § 59.

CRS 53:

§ 7-3-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-3-19.

L. 72:

p. 554, § 1.

Cross references:

For perjury in the first degree, see § 18-8-502.

35-28-120. Deposit to defray expenses.

Prior to the issuance of any marketing order by the commissioner, he may require the applicants therefor to deposit with him such amount as the commissioner may deem necessary to defray the expenses of preparing and making effective such marketing order. Such funds shall be received, deposited, and disbursed by the commissioner in accordance with the provisions as set forth in section 35-28-114.

The commissioner may reimburse the applicant in the amount of any such deposit from any funds received by the commissioner pursuant to the provisions of section 35-28-114.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 208, § 15.

CSA:

C. 106, § 60.

CRS 53:

§ 7-3-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-3-20.

35-28-121. General provisions.

In the event the commissioner finds that it tends to effectuate the declared purposes of this article within the standards prescribed in this article, the commissioner may issue a marketing order, applicable to the marketing of any agricultural commodity containing like terms, provisions, methods, and procedures as any license or order regulating the marketing of such commodity issued by the secretary of agriculture of the United States pursuant to the provisions of any law or laws of the United States. In selecting the members of any board or other advisory agency under such marketing order, the commissioner shall utilize, insofar as practicable, the same persons as those serving in a similar capacity under such federal license or order, so as to avoid duplicating or conflicting personnel.

The commissioner is authorized to confer with and cooperate with the legally constituted authorities of other states and of the United States, for the purpose of obtaining uniformity in the administration of federal and state marketing regulations, licenses, or orders. Said commissioner is authorized to conduct joint hearings and issue joint or concurrent marketing orders for the purposes and within the standards set forth in this article, and he may exercise any administrative authority prescribed by this article to effect such uniformity of administration and regulation.

Nothing in this article applies to any order, rule, or regulation issued or issuable by the public utilities commission with respect to the operation of common carriers.

In any civil or criminal action or proceeding for violation of any rule of statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade, proof that the act complained of was done in compliance with the provisions of this article or a marketing order issued under this article and in furtherance of the purposes and provisions of this article shall be a complete defense to such action or proceeding.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 208, § 16.

CSA:

C. 106, § 61.

L. 53:

p. 118, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 7-3-21.

L. 55:

p. 151, § 11.

L. 61:

p. 167, § 1.

L. 62:

p. 124, § 1.

L. 63:

p. 165, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-3-21.

35-28-122. Application of article.

The provisions of this article shall not be applicable to retailers of agricultural commodities except to the extent that any retailer also engaged in the processing or distribution of agricultural commodities as defined in this article; but all persons acting as producers, handlers, processors, or distributors shall conform with all the provisions of any applicable marketing order, marketing agreement, or regulations issued pursuant to this law before shipping or causing to be shipped any agricultural commodity.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 209, § 17.

CSA:

C. 106, § 62.

CRS 53:

§ 7-3-22.

L. 55:

p. 151, § 12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-3-22.

L. 69:

p. 115, § 8.

35-28-123. Other laws superseded.

It is the legislative intent that the provisions of this article shall control, to the exclusion of any general law of this state in conflict therewith, and specifically shall supersede the provisions of article 23 of this title, if said article is in conflict herewith.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 209, § 18.

CSA:

C. 106, § 63.

CRS 53:

§ 7-3-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-3-23.

35-28-124. Agricultural commodities - preferences - promotion - task force - legislative declaration - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1733, § 1, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective May 1, 2005. (See L. 2004, p. 1733.)